California statutes. Education Code
(a) (1) A county superintendent of schools shall establish a parent advisory committee to provide advice to the county board of education and the county superintendent of schools regarding the requirements of this article.

(2) A parent advisory committee shall include parents or legal guardians of pupils currently enrolled in county office of education-operated schools to whom one or more of the definitions in Section 42238.01
 apply, and parents or legal guardians of pupils with disabilities currently enrolled in county office of education-operated schools.

(3) A parent advisory committee shall include at least two pupils as full members. The pupils shall serve for a renewable term of one full school year.

(4) This subdivision shall not require a county superintendent of schools to include two pupil members on the parent advisory committee if the county superintendent of schools establishes or has already established a student advisory committee pursuant to subdivision (b).

(5) This subdivision shall not require the county superintendent of schools to establish a new parent advisory committee if the county
 superintendent of schools already has established a parent advisory committee that meets the requirements of this subdivision, including any committee established to meet the requirements of the federal Elementary and Secondary Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 6301 et seq.) pursuant to Section 6312 of that act.

(b) (1) A county superintendent of schools shall establish a student advisory committee to provide advice to the county board of education and the county superintendent of schools regarding the requirements of this article.

(2) This subdivision shall not require a county superintendent of schools to establish a new student advisory committee if a county superintendent of schools has already established a student advisory committee that meets the requirements of this
 subdivision, or has two established pupil positions on the parent advisory committee pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) (1) A county superintendent of schools shall establish an English learner parent advisory committee if the enrollment of the pupils in the schools and programs operated by the county superintendent of schools includes at least 15 percent English learners and the schools and programs operated by the county superintendent of schools enroll at least 50 pupils who are English learners.

(2) This subdivision shall not require the county superintendent of schools to establish a new English learner parent advisory committee if the county superintendent of schools already has established a committee that meets the requirements of this subdivision.

(d) A county superintendent of schools shall take into consideration that the pupil members of a parent advisory committee or student advisory committee represent the diversity of the county’s pupils, including geographical, socioeconomic, cultural, physical, and educational diversity. Particular effort should be made to reach out to at-risk or disadvantaged pupils to serve as members of a parent advisory committee or student advisory committee, as their participation will provide keen insight into many of the issues that pupils face in their day-to-day lives.

(e) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2024.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 4) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 922, Sec. 5.   (SB 997)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative July 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

52070.

(a) Not later than five days after adoption of a local control and accountability plan or annual update to a local control and accountability plan, the governing board of a school district shall file the local control and accountability plan or annual update to the local control and accountability plan with the county superintendent of schools.

(b) On or before August 15 of each year, the county superintendent of schools may seek clarification, in writing, from the governing board of a school district about the contents of the local control and accountability plan or annual update to the local control and accountability plan. Within 15 days the governing board of a school district shall respond, in writing, to requests for clarification.

(c) Within 15 days of receiving the response from the governing board of the school district, the county superintendent of schools may submit recommendations, in writing, for amendments to the local control and accountability plan or annual update to the local control and accountability plan. The governing board of a school district shall consider the recommendations submitted by the county superintendent of schools in a public meeting within 15 days of receiving the recommendations.

(d) The county superintendent of schools shall approve a local control and accountability plan or annual update to a local control and accountability plan on or before October 8, if the county superintendent of schools determines all of the following:

(1) The local control and accountability plan or annual update to the local control and
 accountability plan adheres to the template adopted by the state board pursuant to Section 52064 and follows any instructions or directions for completing the template that are adopted by the state board, including, but not limited to, all of the following requirements:

(A) If applicable to the school district, the local control and accountability plan includes one or more specific actions consistent with the instructions developed by the state board pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (e) of Section 52064.

(B) If applicable to the school district, the local control and accountability plan includes all required actions consistent with the instructions developed by the state board pursuant to paragraph (6) of subdivision (e) of Section 52064.

(C) If applicable to the school district, the local control and
 accountability plan includes one or more focused goals consistent with the instructions developed by the state board pursuant to paragraph (7) of subdivision (e) of Section 52064.

(D) Each specific action identified as contributing to the demonstration that the school district will increase or improve services for unduplicated pupils in proportion to the increase in funds apportioned on the basis of the number and concentration of unduplicated pupils, consistent with regulations adopted by the state board pursuant to Section 42238.07, subdivisions (c), (d), and (e) of Section 42238.07, and any applicable instructions developed by the state board pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 52064, provided on a schoolwide or districtwide basis is supported by the required description.

(E) If applicable to the school district, the local control and accountability plan
 includes a description of the specific action or actions that improve services for unduplicated pupils, meets the requirements of subparagraph (D), and demonstrates how the degree of improvement in services is sufficient to increase or improve services for unduplicated pupils in proportion to the increase in funds apportioned on the basis of the number and concentration of unduplicated pupils, as required by subparagraph (B) of paragraph (6) of subdivision (b) of Section 52064.

(F) For school districts that meet the criteria of Section 52071 or 52072, or both, the local control and accountability plan includes actions and services that implement the work related to technical assistance for improving the outcomes of the pupil group or groups that lead to identification.

(2) The budget for the applicable fiscal year adopted by the governing board of the school district includes
 expenditures sufficient to implement the specific actions and strategies included in the local control and accountability plan adopted by the governing board of the school district, based on the projections of the costs included in the plan.

(3) The local control and accountability plan or annual update to the local control and accountability plan adheres to the expenditure requirements adopted pursuant to Section 42238.07 for funds apportioned on the basis of the number and concentration of unduplicated pupils pursuant to Sections 42238.02 and 42238.03, and any applicable instructions for the local control and accountability plan developed by the state board pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 52064, including, but not limited to, the requirement that any specific action provided on a schoolwide or districtwide basis is supported by the required description.

(4) The local control and accountability plan includes the calculations required by paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 42238.07 and, if applicable to the school district pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 42238.07, includes a description of the planned uses of the specified funds and a description of how the planned uses of those funds satisfy the requirements for specific actions to be considered as contributing toward meeting the increased or improved services requirement pursuant to regulations adopted by the state board pursuant to Section 42238.07.

(e) If a county superintendent of schools has jurisdiction over a single school district, the Superintendent shall perform the duties specified in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 48, Sec. 68.   (SB 114)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

52070.5.

(a) Not later than five days after adoption of a local control and accountability plan or annual update to a local control and accountability plan, the county board of education shall file the local control and accountability plan or annual update to the local control and accountability plan with the Superintendent.

(b) On or before August 15 of each year, the Superintendent may seek clarification, in writing, from the county board of education about the contents of the local control and accountability plan or annual update to the local control and accountability plan. Within 15 days the county board of education shall respond, in writing, to requests for clarification.

(c) Within 15 days of
 receiving the response from the county board of education, the Superintendent may submit recommendations, in writing, for amendments to the local control and accountability plan or annual update to the local control and accountability plan. The county board of education shall consider the recommendations submitted by the Superintendent in a public meeting within 15 days of receiving the recommendations.

(d) The Superintendent shall approve a local control and accountability plan or annual update to a local control and accountability plan on or before October 8, if the Superintendent determines all of the following:

(1) The local control and accountability plan or annual update to the local control and accountability plan adheres to the template adopted by the state board pursuant to Section 52064 and follows any instructions or directions for completing the template that are
 adopted by the state board, including, but not limited to, all of the following requirements:

(A) If applicable to the county office of education, the local control and accountability plan includes one or more specific actions consistent with the instructions developed by the state board pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (e) of Section 52064.

(B) If applicable to the county office of education, the local control and accountability plan includes all required actions consistent with the instructions developed by the state board pursuant to paragraph (6) of subdivision (e) of Section 52064.

(C) If applicable to the county office of education, the local control and accountability plan includes one or more focused goals consistent with the instructions developed by the state board pursuant to paragraph (7) of
 subdivision (e) of Section 52064.

(D) Each specific action identified as contributing to the demonstration that the county office of education will increase or improve services for unduplicated pupils in proportion to the increase in funds apportioned on the basis of the number and concentration of unduplicated pupils, consistent with regulations adopted by the state board pursuant to Section 42238.07, subdivisions (c), (d), and (e) of Section 42238.07, and any applicable instructions developed by the state board pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 52064, provided on a schoolwide or countywide basis is supported by the required description.

(E) If applicable to the county office of education, the local control and accountability plan includes a description of the specific action or actions that improve services for unduplicated pupils, meets the requirements of
 subparagraph (D), and demonstrates how the degree of improvement in services is sufficient to satisfy the requirement to increase or improve services for unduplicated pupils in proportion to the increase in funds apportioned on the basis of the number and concentration of unduplicated pupils, as required by subparagraph (B) of paragraph (6) of subdivision (b) of Section 52064.

(F) For county offices of education that meet the criteria of Section 52071.5 or 52072.5, or both, the local control and accountability plan includes actions and services that implement the work related to technical assistance for improving the outcomes of the pupil group or groups that lead to identification.

(2) The budget for the applicable fiscal year adopted by the county board of education includes expenditures sufficient to implement the specific actions and strategies included in the local control
 and accountability plan adopted by the county board of education, based on the projections of the costs included in the plan.

(3) The local control and accountability plan or annual update to the local control and accountability plan adheres to the expenditure requirements adopted pursuant to Section 42238.07 for funds apportioned on the basis of the number and concentration of unduplicated pupils pursuant to Sections 2574 and 2575, and any applicable instructions for the local control and accountability plan developed by the state board pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 52064, including, but not limited to, the requirement that any specific action provided on a schoolwide or countywide basis is supported by the required description.

(4) The local control and accountability plan includes the calculations required by paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (c)
 of Section 42238.07 and, if applicable to the county office of education pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 42238.07, includes a description of the planned uses of the specified funds and a description of how the planned uses of those funds satisfy the requirements for specific actions to be considered as contributing toward meeting the increased or improved services requirement pursuant to regulations adopted by the state board pursuant to Section 42238.07.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 48, Sec. 69.   (SB 114)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

52071.

(a) If the governing board of a school district requests technical assistance, the county superintendent of schools shall provide technical assistance consistent with subdivision (c). If a school district has not been identified for technical assistance pursuant to subdivision (c) or for state intervention pursuant to Section 52072, and if the service requested creates an unreasonable or untenable cost burden for the county superintendent of schools, the county superintendent of schools may assess the school district a fee not to exceed the cost of the service.

(b) If a county superintendent of schools does not approve a local control and accountability plan or annual update to the local control and accountability plan approved by a governing board of a school
 district, the county superintendent of schools shall provide technical assistance focused on revising the local control and accountability plan or annual update so that it can be approved.

(c) Beginning with the release of the 2026 California School Dashboard pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 52064.5, and upon determination by the department every three years thereafter, for any school district for which one or more pupil subgroups identified pursuant to Section 52052 meets the criteria established pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 52064.5, which may also include an all pupils subgroup as described in Section 52064.5, the county superintendent of schools shall provide technical assistance for a minimum of three years following the identification that shall be focused on building the school district’s capacity to develop and implement actions and services responsive to pupil and community needs, including, but not limited to, any of
 the following:

(1) Assisting the school district to do each of the following:

(A) Identify its strengths and weaknesses in regard to the state priorities described in subdivision (d) of Section 52060. This shall include working collaboratively with the school district to review performance data on the state and local indicators included in the California School Dashboard authorized by subdivision (f) of Section 52064.5, including educator qualifications data and relevant local data to identify effective, evidence-based programs or practices that address any areas of weakness.

(B) Identify pupil subgroups that are low performing or experiencing significant disparities from other pupil subgroups as identified on the California School Dashboard. The county superintendent of schools may consult equity leads pursuant to
 Section 52073.5 to identify and implement effective programs and practices to improve the outcomes and opportunities for low-performing pupil subgroups or pupil subgroups experiencing significant disparities from other pupil subgroups.

(2) Working collaboratively with the school district to secure assistance from an academic, programmatic, or fiscal expert or team of experts to identify and implement effective programs and practices that are designed to improve performance in any areas of weakness identified by the school district. The county superintendent of schools, in consultation with the school district, may solicit another service provider, which may include, but is not limited to, a school district, county office of education, or charter school, to act as a partner to the school district in need of technical assistance.

(3) Obtaining from the school district timely
 documentation demonstrating that it has completed the activities described in paragraphs (1) and (2) or substantially similar activities, or has selected another service provider pursuant to subdivision (f) to work with the school district to complete the activities described in subparagraphs (A) and (B), or substantially similar activities, and ongoing communication with the school district to assess the school district’s progress in improving pupil outcomes.

(4) Requesting that the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence provide advice and assistance to the school district, pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 52074.

(5) A review of the school district’s local control and accountability plan to identify areas of strengths and weaknesses in the identified goals, actions, and services, with a particular focus on those areas considered to be contributing toward
 meeting the increased or improved services requirement and all required goals.

(d) Upon request of a county superintendent of schools or a school district, a geographic lead agency identified pursuant to Section 52073 may provide technical assistance pursuant to subdivision (c). A geographic lead agency identified pursuant to Section 52073 may request that another geographic lead agency, an expert lead agency identified pursuant to Section 52073.1, a special education resource lead identified pursuant to Section 52073.2, or the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence provide the assistance described in this subdivision.

(e) A school district shall accept the technical assistance provided by the county superintendent of schools pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (c). For purposes of accepting technical assistance provided by the county superintendent of schools pursuant
 to subdivision (c), a school district may satisfy this requirement by providing the timely documentation to, and maintaining regular communication with, the county superintendent of schools as specified in paragraph (3) of subdivision (c).

(f) For the 2025–26 fiscal year, any school district in which one or more pupil subgroups, identified pursuant to Section 52052, meets the criteria pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 52064.5, as that section read on January 1, 2026, for three or more consecutive years, the school district’s geographic lead agency, identified pursuant to Section 52073, shall, in collaboration with the county superintendent of schools, provide technical assistance to the school district pursuant to subdivision (c), as that subdivision read on January 1, 2026, for a minimum of two years. The geographic lead agency shall evaluate whether the assistance of one or more expert lead agencies should be consulted as part of the
 technical assistance process.

(g) This section shall not preclude a school district from soliciting technical assistance from entities other than its county superintendent of schools at its own cost.

(h) Notwithstanding any other law, for the 2026–27 fiscal year, for any school district in which one or more pupil subgroups, identified pursuant to Section 52052, meets the criteria established pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 52064.5, as that section read on January 1, 2026, as reported on the 2025 California School Dashboard pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 52064.5, the county superintendent of schools shall provide technical assistance pursuant to subdivision (c), as that subdivision read on January 1, 2026.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 250, Sec. 22.   (SB 133)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

52071.1.

(a) If the governing board of a school district requests technical assistance regarding the school district’s data management processes, the county superintendent of schools shall provide technical assistance consistent with subdivision (b). If a school district has not been identified for technical assistance pursuant to subdivision (b), and if the service requested creates an unreasonable or untenable cost burden for the county superintendent of schools, the county superintendent of schools may assess the school district a fee not to exceed the cost of the service.

(b) For any school district that fails to meet the requirements of Section 60900, the county superintendent of schools shall provide technical assistance for a minimum of one
 year that shall be focused on the school district’s data management processes and building the school district’s capacity to develop and implement actions and services responsive to data quality and integrity in support of state and federal accountability, including, but not limited to, any of the following:

(1) Assisting the school district to identify its strengths and weaknesses in meeting state and federal reporting requirements pursuant to Section 60900. This shall include working collaboratively with the school district to review California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System data reporting practices, including, but not limited to, the roles and responsibilities, data management policies and data collection submission processes, monitoring and oversight of the student information system, and accountability and audit mechanisms that address any areas of weakness to ensure the submission of accurate data according to the processes
 and timelines established by the department pursuant to Section 60900.

(2) Working collaboratively with the school district to secure assistance from an expert or team of experts to identify and implement effective programs and initiatives that are designed to improve performance in any areas of weakness identified by the school district pursuant to paragraph (1). The county superintendent of schools, in consultation with the school district, may solicit another service provider, which may include, but is not limited to, a school district, a county office of education, or the California School Information Services, established pursuant to Section 49081, to act as a partner to the school district in need of technical assistance.

(3) Obtaining from the school district timely documentation demonstrating that it has completed the activities described in paragraphs (1) and (2), or
 substantially similar activities, or has selected another service provider to work with the school district to complete the activities described in paragraphs (1) and (2), or substantially similar activities, and ongoing communication with the school district to assess the school district’s progress in improving data management practices.

(c) A school district shall accept the technical assistance provided by the county superintendent of schools pursuant to subdivision (b). For purposes of accepting technical assistance provided by the county superintendent of schools pursuant to subdivision (b), a school district may satisfy this requirement by providing the timely documentation to, and maintaining regular communication with, the county superintendent of schools as specified in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b).

(d) For a school district or county office of education that operates
 within a city or county in which there is a single school district, including the Counties of Alpine, Amador, Del Norte, Mariposa, Plumas, and Sierra, and the City and County of San Francisco, and the school district is identified for technical assistance pursuant to subdivision (b), the department shall provide the technical assistance described in subdivision (a) of Section 52071.51 to the eligible school district.

(e) This section shall not preclude a school district from:

(1) Requesting or receiving technical assistance pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 52071.

(2) Soliciting technical assistance from entities other than its county superintendent of schools at its own cost.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 109.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

52071.5.

(a) If the Superintendent does not approve a local control and accountability plan or annual update to the local control and accountability plan approved by a county board of education, or if the county board of education requests technical assistance, the Superintendent shall provide technical assistance focused on revising the local control and accountability plan or annual update so that it can be approved.

(b) Beginning with the release of the 2026 California School Dashboard pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 52064.5, and upon determination by the department every three years thereafter, for any county office of education for which one or more pupil subgroups identified pursuant to Section 52052 meets the criteria established pursuant to subdivision
 (g) of Section 52064.5, which may also include an all pupils subgroup as described in Section 52064.5, the Superintendent shall provide technical assistance for a minimum of three years following the identification that shall be focused on building the county office of education’s capacity to develop and implement actions and services responsive to pupil and community needs, including, among other things, any of the following:

(1) Assisting the county office of education to do each of the following:

(A) Identify its strengths and weaknesses in regard to the state priorities described in subdivision (d) of Section 52066. This shall include working collaboratively with the county office of education to review performance data on the state and local indicators included in the California School Dashboard authorized by subdivision (f) of Section 52064.5, including educator
 qualifications data and relevant local data to identify effective, evidence-based programs or practices that address any areas of weakness.

(B) Identify pupil subgroups that are low performing or experiencing significant disparities from other pupil subgroups as identified on the California School Dashboard. The Superintendent may consult equity leads pursuant to Section 52073.5 to identify and implement effective programs and practices to improve the outcomes and opportunities for low-performing pupil subgroups or pupil subgroups experiencing significant disparities from other pupil subgroups.

(2) Working collaboratively with the county office of education to secure assistance from an academic expert or team of academic experts to identify and implement effective programs that are designed to improve performance in any areas of weakness identified by the county office of
 education. The Superintendent, in consultation with the county office of education, may solicit another service provider, which may include, but is not limited to, a school district, county office of education, or charter school, to act as a partner to the county office of education in need of technical assistance.

(3) Obtaining from the county office of education timely documentation demonstrating that it has completed the activities described in paragraphs (1) and (2), or has selected another service provider to work with the county office of education to complete the activities described in paragraphs (1) and (2), or substantially similar activities, and ongoing communication with the county office of education to assess the county office of education’s progress in improving pupil outcomes.

(4) Requesting that the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence provide
 advice and assistance to the county office of education pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 52074.

(5) A review of the county office of education’s local control and accountability plan to identify areas of strengths and weaknesses in the identified goals, actions, and services, with a particular focus on those areas considered to be contributing toward meeting the increased or improved services requirement and all required goals.

(c) Technical assistance provided pursuant to this section at the request of a county board of education shall be paid for by the county board of education receiving assistance.

(d) Notwithstanding any other law, for the 2026–27 fiscal year, for any county office of education in which one or more pupil
 subgroups, identified pursuant to Section 52052, meets the criteria established pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 52064.5, as that section read on January 1, 2026, as reported on the 2025 California School Dashboard pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 52064.5, the Superintendent shall provide technical assistance pursuant to subdivision (b), as that subdivision read on January 1, 2026.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 250, Sec. 23.   (SB 133)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

52071.51.

(a) For any county office of education that fails to meet the requirements of Section 60900, the department shall provide technical assistance for a minimum of one year that shall be focused on the county office of education’s data management processes and building the county office of education’s capacity to develop and implement actions and services responsive to data quality and integrity in support of state and federal accountability, including, but not limited to, any of the following:

(1) Assisting the county office of education to identify its strengths and weaknesses in meeting state and federal reporting requirements pursuant to Section 60900. This shall include working collaboratively with the county office of education to review
 California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System data reporting practices, including, but not limited to, the roles and responsibilities, data management policies and data collection submission processes, monitoring and oversight of the student information system, and accountability and audit mechanisms that address any areas of weakness to ensure the submission of accurate data according to the processes and timelines established by the department pursuant to Section 60900.

(2) Working collaboratively with the county office of education to secure assistance from an expert or team of experts to identify and implement effective programs that are designed to improve performance in any areas of weakness identified by the county office of education pursuant to paragraph (1). The department, in consultation with the county office of education, may solicit another service provider, which may include, but is not limited to, a school district,
 county office of education, or the California School Information Services, established pursuant to Section 49081, to act as a partner to the county office of education in need of technical assistance.

(3) Obtaining from the county office of education timely documentation demonstrating that it has completed the activities described in paragraphs (1) and (2), or has selected another service provider to work with the county office of education to complete the activities described in paragraphs (1) and (2), or substantially similar activities, and ongoing communication with the county office of education to assess the county office of education’s progress in improving data management practices.

(b) Technical assistance provided pursuant to this section at the request of a county board of education shall be paid for by the county board of education receiving
 assistance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 111.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

52072.

(a) Beginning with the release of the 2026 California School Dashboard pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 52064.5, and upon determination by the department every three years thereafter, if a school district meets the criteria established by the state board pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 52064.5, as that section read on January 1, 2026,
 for three or more pupil subgroups identified pursuant to Section 52052 or, if the school district has less than three pupil subgroups, all of the school district’s pupil subgroups, in three out of four consecutive school years, the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence shall determine, in consultation with the school district and any provider of technical assistance pursuant to Section 52071, if assistance from the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence is necessary. When making this determination, primary consideration shall be given to the needs of the pupils in the school district.

(b) Technical assistance provided pursuant to this section shall be facilitated by the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence, in collaboration with the county superintendent of schools with jurisdiction over the school district, and shall focus on building the school district’s capacity to develop and
 implement actions and services responsive to pupil and community needs pursuant to Section 52071 in a manner that streamlines improvement efforts for the school district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 112.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

52072.1.

(a) The Superintendent may, with the approval of the state board, identify school districts in need of intervention.

(b) The Superintendent shall only intervene in a school district identified pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 52072 and where the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence determines that the school district meets either of the following criteria:

(1) The school district has failed, or is unable, to implement the recommendations of the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence.

(2) That the inadequate performance of the school district, based upon an evaluation rubric adopted
 pursuant to Section 52064.5, is either so persistent or acute as to require intervention by the Superintendent.

(c) For school districts identified pursuant to subdivision (a), the Superintendent may, with the approval of the state board, do one or more of the following:

(1) Make changes to a local control and accountability plan adopted by the governing board of the school district.

(2) Develop and impose a budget revision, in conjunction with revisions to the local control and accountability plan, that the Superintendent determines would allow the school district to improve the outcomes for all pupil subgroups identified pursuant to Section 52052 in regard to state and local priorities.

(3) Stay or rescind an action, if that action is not required by
 a local collective bargaining agreement, that would prevent the school district from improving outcomes for all pupil subgroups identified pursuant to Section 52052 in regard to state or local priorities.

(4) Appoint an academic trustee to exercise the powers and authority specified in this section on the Superintendent’s behalf.

(d) The Superintendent shall notify the county superintendent of schools, the county board of education, the superintendent of the school district, and the governing board of the school district of any action by the state board to direct the Superintendent to exercise any of the powers and authorities specified in this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 48, Sec. 74.   (SB 114)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

52072.5.

(a) Beginning with the release of the 2026 California School Dashboard pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 52064.5, and upon determination by the department every three years thereafter, if a county office of education meets the criteria established by the state board pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 52064.5, as that section read on January 1,
 2026,
 for three or more pupil subgroups identified pursuant to Section 52052 or, if the county office of education has less than three pupil subgroups, all of the county office of education’s pupil subgroups, in three out of four consecutive school years, the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence shall determine, in consultation with the county office of education and any provider of technical assistance pursuant to Section 52071.5, if assistance from the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence is necessary. When making this determination, primary consideration shall be given to the needs of the pupils in the county office of education.

(b) Technical assistance provided pursuant to this section shall be facilitated by the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence, in collaboration with the department, and shall focus on building the county office of education’s capacity to develop and implement
 actions and services responsive to pupil and community needs pursuant to Section 52071.5 in a manner that streamlines improvement efforts for the county office of education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 113.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

52072.6.

(a) The Superintendent may, with the approval of the state board, identify county offices of education in need of intervention.

(b) The Superintendent shall only intervene in a county office of education identified pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 52072.5 and where the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence determines that the county office of education meets either of the following criteria:
